Mississippi statutes. Title 85. Debtor-Creditor Relationship
Article 9. Water, Oil and Gas Wells.

§ 85-7-131.
Liens on water, oil or gas wells;
effect as to purchasers, etc., without notice.

Every water well or oil and gas well, and any fixed machinery, gearing or other fixture that may or may not be used or connected therewith, shall be liable for services or construction and the debt shall be a lien thereon. As to oil and gas wells, the operator thereof shall have a lien upon the interest of each nonoperator owner of an interest in the mineral leasehold estate for the nonoperator’s proportionate part of the labor, material and services rendered by the operator or for the operator’s account on behalf of each nonoperator in the drilling, completion, recompletion, reworking or other operations of the oil and gas well. If the structure is a water well, the lien shall extend only to all pumps, pipes, equipment therein and all water well appurtenances. If the structure is an oil or gas well, the lien shall extend to the nonoperator’s interest in the mineral estate and the fixtures and equipment in the producing unit assigned to the well by the State Oil and Gas Board. The lien shall take effect, as to purchasers or encumbrancers for a valuable consideration without notice thereof, only from the time of commencing suit to enforce the lien, or from the time of filing the contract under which the lien arose, or notice thereof, in the office of the clerk of the chancery court, as hereinafter stated; delivery of material to the job is prima facie evidence of its use therein, and use of water from a water well is prima facie evidence of acceptability of the well. In the case of oil and gas wells, the lien shall take effect, as to purchasers or encumbrancers for a valuable consideration without notice thereof, only from the time of filing notice of the lien as provided by Section 85-7-133.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 45, art. 6 (1); 1857, ch. 39, art. 1; 1871, § 1603; 1880, § 1378; 1892, § 2698; 1906, § 3058; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2418; 1930, § 2258; 1942, § 356; Laws, 1926, ch. 150; Laws, 1928, ch. 137; Laws, 1962, ch. 488, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1964, ch. 291; Laws, 1979, ch. 379; Laws, 2010, ch. 372, § 1; Laws, 2014, ch. 487, § 18, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 11, 2014).

§ 85-7-132.
Lien to enforce violations related to oil and gas production.

Every building, well or structure of any kind, and any fixed machinery, gearing or other fixture that may or may not be used or connected therewith, and all fixtures and equipment in the producing unit assigned such well by the Oil and Gas Board shall be liable for any penalty, civil fine or other expense arising from the violation of any statute of this state with respect to the conservation of oil and gas, or any provision of Sections 53-1-1 through 53-1-47 and Sections 53-3-1 through 53-3-21, or any rule, regulation or order made by the board thereunder. The Oil and Gas Board may use the provisions of this chapter to enforce any such lien. The Oil and Gas Board shall perfect such lien in the county or counties where the property or equipment involved in the violation is located. Such lien shall take effect as to purchasers or encumbrancers for a valuable consideration without notice thereof only from the time of filing notice of such lien as provided by Section 85-7-133.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1997, ch. 482, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 27, 1997).

§ 85-7-133.
Chancery clerk to keep record of liens.

Each of the several chancery clerks of this state shall provide in his office, as a part of the land records of his county, a record entitled “Notice of Liens” wherein notices under Section 85-7-131 shall be filed and recorded, and the liens shall not take effect until some notation of the lien is filed and recorded in the record showing a description of the property involved, the name of the lienor or lienors, the date of filing, if and where suit is filed, and if and where contract is filed or recorded.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 45, art. 6 (1); 1857, ch. 39, art. 1; 1871, § 1603; 1880, § 1378; 1892, § 2698; 1906, § 3058; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2418; 1930, § 2258; 1942, § 356; Laws, 1926, ch. 150; Laws, 1928, ch. 137; Laws, 1962, ch. 488, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1964, ch. 291; Laws, 1994, ch. 521, § 39; Laws, 2014, ch. 487, § 19, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 11, 2014).

§§ 85-7-135 through 85-7-139.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2014, ch. 487, § 24, effective from and after passage April 11, 2014.

§85-7-135. [Codes, 1857, ch. 39, art. 2; 1871, § 1604; 1880, § 1379; 1892, § 2699; 1906, § 3059; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2419; 1930, § 2259; 1942, § 357; Laws, 1926, ch. 150; Laws, 2010, ch. 372, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2010.]

§85-7-137. [Codes, 1857, ch. 39, art. 3; 1871, § 1605; 1880, § 1380; 1892, § 2700; 1906, § 3060; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2420; 1930, § 2260; 1942, § 358.]

§85-7-139. [Codes, 1857, ch. 39, art. 5; 1871, § 1607; 1880, § 1382; 1892, § 2701; 1906, § 3061; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2421; 1930, § 2261; 1942, § 359.]

§ 85-7-141.
Commencement of suit to enforce lien.

Any person entitled to and desiring to have the benefit of a lien under Section 85-7-131 shall commence his suit in the circuit or county court of the county in which the property or some part thereof is situated, if the principal of his demand exceeds Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00), within twelve (12) months next after the time when the money due and claimed by the suit became due and payable following the day on which the last of the labor was performed or material or rental or lease equipment was supplied by the person bringing the action, and not after; and the suit shall be commenced by petition, describing with reasonable certainty the property upon which the lien is averred to exist, and setting out the nature of the contract and indebtedness, and the amount thereof; and the plaintiff shall file therewith in all cases, except where the whole work or materials, or both, were furnished in pursuance of a written contract for an aggregate price, a bill of particulars exhibiting the amount and kind of labor performed, and of materials furnished, and the prices at which and times when the same were performed and furnished; and such suits shall be docketed and conducted as other suits in that court, and may be tried at the first term.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 45, art. 7 (3); 1857, ch. 39, art. 6; 1871, § 1609; 1880, § 1384; 1892, § 2702; 1906, § 3062; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2422; 1930, § 2262; 1942, § 360; Laws, 1904, ch. 152; Laws, 2011, ch. 457, § 1; Laws, 2014, ch. 487, § 20, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 11, 2014).

§ 85-7-143.
Parties to the suit.

All persons having an interest in the controversy, and all persons claiming liens on the same property, by virtue of Section 85-7-131, shall be made parties to the suit; and should any necessary or proper party be omitted, he may be brought in by amendment, on his own application or that of any other party interested; and claims of several parties having liens on the same property may be joined in the same action.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 39, art 7; 1871, § 1610; 1880, § 1385; 1892, § 2703; 1906, § 3063; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2423; 1930, § 2263; 1942, § 361; Laws, 2014, ch. 487, § 21, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 11, 2014).

§ 85-7-145.
Summons of defendants.

In all actions to enforce a lien granted by Section 85-7-131, the defendants shall be summoned, as in other actions at law, to appear and defend the action; and in case any necessary party defendant shall be a nonresident of or absent from the state, or cannot be found, he may be made a party by publication, as in cases of nonresident or absent defendants in chancery, requiring him to appear on a day to be therein named; and in default of appearance, the same proceedings shall be had as if the defendant had been duly summoned and made default.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 39, art. 8; 1871, § 1611; 1880, § 1386; 1892, § 2704; 1906, § 3064; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2424; 1930, § 2264; 1942, § 362; Laws, 2014, ch. 487, § 22, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 11, 2014).

§ 85-7-147.
Defenses and counterclaims.

In all actions to enforce a lien granted by Section 85-7-131, the defendants, or any of them, by answer to the petition, may make any defense they may have against the demand of the plaintiff, and also any counterclaim against him touching the subject-matter of the suit. And should any defendant claim to have a lien upon the same property, for materials furnished or labor done thereon, he may present the lien by his answer; and the cause shall be at issue without a replication, and the parties shall be confined at the trial to the cause of action and defense set forth in the pleadings.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 39, art. 9; 1871, § 1612; 1880, § 1387; 1892, § 2705; 1906, § 3065; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2425; 1930, § 2265; 1942, § 363; Laws, 2014, ch. 487, § 23, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 11, 2014).

§§ 85-7-149 and 85-7-151.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws 2014, ch. 487, § 24, effective upon approval April 11, 2014.

§85-7-149. [Codes, 1857, ch. 39, art. 10; 1871, § 1613; 1880, § 1388; 1892, § 2706; 1906, § 3066; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2426; 1930, § 2266; 1942, § 364.]

§85-7-151. [Codes, 1857, ch. 39, art. 11; 1871, § 1614; 1880, § 1389; 1892, § 2707; 1906, § 3067; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2427; 1930, § 2267; 1942, § 365; Laws, 1987, ch. 392, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1987.]

§ 85-7-153.
Execution.

When the judgment shall be against the house, building, structure, or fixture and land, or against the same without the land, or against a railroad, or railroad embankment, a special writ of execution shall issue, to make the amount recovered by sale of the property, which shall be described therein; and when both a general and special judgment shall be given, both writs may be issued, either separately or combined in one, or one may be issued after the return of the other for the whole or the residue, as the case may require.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 39, art. 12; 1871, § 1615; 1880, § 1390; 1892, § 2708; 1906, § 3068; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2428; 1930, § 2268; 1942, § 366.

§ 85-7-155.
Sale of house, building, etc., with or without land; procedure; purchaser’s estate in land.

If such special writ of execution be for the sale of a house, building, structure, or fixture and the land, or for the sale of the same without the land, the officer shall levy on, advertise, sell, and convey the same as in other cases of land levied on for debt; and if the sale be of the house, building, structure, or fixtures alone, and the same shall have been erected or constructed and put on the land subsequently to a former encumbrance on the land, the purchaser shall acquire the same free from such former encumbrance, and his purchase shall authorize him to enter and remove such house, building, structure, or fixture from the land with reasonable dispatch; but if the house, building, structure or fixture so sold, or sold with the land, shall have been simply altered or repaired subsequently to a former encumbrance on the land, the purchaser shall acquire the same subject to such encumbrance, unless the encumbrancer consented in writing to the alteration or repairs, in which case the house, building, structure, or fixtures so altered or repaired shall be sold free from such encumbrance, and with the right in the purchaser to enter and remove the same. If the land be sold also, the purchaser shall acquire such estate therein as the owner or builder, as the case may be, had at the time the lien to enforce which the sale is made attached thereon, or at any time afterwards, subject to prior encumbrances; but buildings, structures, or fixtures erected or constructed and put on the land subsequently to prior encumbrances shall pass to the purchaser as if the sale were of such buildings, structures, or fixtures alone.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1857, ch. 39, art. 13; 1871, § 1616; 1880, § 1391; 1892, § 2709; 1906, § 3069; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2429; 1930, § 2269; 1942, § 367.

§ 85-7-157.
Sale of railroad land or buildings; procedure; purchaser’s estate property.

If the special writ of execution be for the sale of a railroad or railroad embankment, the officer shall levy on, advertise, sell, and convey the same as in case of land levied on for debt; and where the property may be in several counties, the officer may sell the same and the right of way, and all depots and other buildings used or connected therewith, as if the same were situated wholly within his county, and the purchaser shall acquire the property free from all prior encumbrances saving the rights of those having concurrent liens under this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1880, § 1391; 1892, § 2710; 1906, § 3070; Hemingway’s 1917, § 2430; 1930, § 2270; 1942, § 368.